Nebraska, session 109, LB91.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 70-650.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-650.01 Except as provided in sections 70-1101 to 70-1106, whenever any
public power district or public power and irrigation district shall have
acquired, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, any electric distribution system,
or any part or parts thereof, situated within or partly within any city or
village, and such district shall have fully paid and redeemed, or have
accumulated reserves sufficient for the redemption of, all of the bonds or
other obligations of the district evidencing the indebtedness incurred as the
cost of construction or the purchase price of its lines, works, and system,
then and in that event, whenever any such city or village shall so request,
such the said district shall convey without cost all of its right, title, and
interest in and to its electric distribution system, as distinguished from its
generating plants and transmission lines, to such the said city or village
within the territorial limits of which such system is located. The request of
such city or village shall be exercised by a resolution duly adopted by its
governing body. Such resolution shall not become effective until thirty days'
notice of the adoption thereof shall have been given by the governing body by
publication once each week for three successive weeks in some legal newspaper
published and of general circulation in such city or village, or if no such
newspaper is published therein, then by posting in five or more public places
therein. If, within thirty days after the last publication of such notice or
posting thereof, a referendum petition signed by qualified electors of such
city or village equal in number to at least twenty percent of the vote cast at
the last general municipal election held therein shall be filed with the
municipal clerk, such resolution shall not become effective until it has been
approved by a vote of the electors of such municipality at any general or
special municipal election. If a majority of the voters voting on the issue
vote against such resolution, the resolution shall not become effective. If no
such petitions are filed, the resolution shall become effective at the
expiration of such thirty-day period. In the absence of an agreement between
any city or village and the public power district or public power and
irrigation district, the city or village may at any time determine what shall
be included in the term distribution system by a declaratory judgment in which
the public power district or public power and irrigation district owning the
distribution system shall be joined. This section shall not: (1) Prevent the
refinancing or changing of the form of the outstanding indebtedness of the
district existing on May 4, 1945, where the amount of the outstanding bonds or
other evidences of indebtedness representing the cost of existing facilities
shall not be increased nor the time of payment extended by any obligations for
which the revenue received through the said electric distribution systems is
pledged, or (2) prevent the issuance of other and different series of bonds of
the district representing the cost of acquisition or construction of additional
electric facilities, or the pledging of the revenue of such additional
facilities for the payment of such other or further series of bonds, or to
prevent the board of directors of such the said district, by a duly adopted
resolution, from making reasonable determinations of the amount of the revenue
of the district attributable to such additional facilities.
Sec. 2. Original section 70-650.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-